Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB17.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 15.382 is amended to read as follows:
A person certified after December 1, 1998, under KRS 15.380 to 15.404 or qualified
under the requirements set forth in KRS 15.440(1)(d)6. shall, at the time of becoming
certified, meet the following minimum qualifications:
(1) Be a citizen of the United States;
(2) Be at least twenty-one (21) years of age;
(3) (a) Be a high school graduate, regardless of whether the school is accredited or
certified by a governing body, provided that the education received met the
attendance and curriculum standards of Kentucky law at the time of
graduation, as determined by the Kentucky Department of Education; or
(b) Possess a High School Equivalency Diploma;
(4) Possess a valid license to operate a motor vehicle;
(5) Be fingerprinted for a criminal background check;
(6) Not have been convicted of any felony; a misdemeanor under KRS 510.120,
510.130, or 510.140; a second or subsequent offense under KRS 510.148; or a
criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit any degree of
rape, sodomy, sexual abuse, or sexual misconduct; or have had any offense listed
under this subsection expunged;
(7) Not be prohibited by federal or state law from possessing a firearm;
(8) Have received and read the Kentucky Law Enforcement Officers Code of Ethics as
established by the council;
(9) Have not received a dishonorable discharge, bad conduct discharge, or general
discharge under other than honorable conditions, if having served in any branch of
the Armed Forces of the United States;
(10) Have passed a medical examination as defined by the council by administrative
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 12/23/2024 12:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 257
regulation and provided by a licensed physician, physician assistant, or advanced
practice registered nurse to determine if he or she can perform peace officer duties
as determined by a validated job task analysis. However, if the employing agency
has its own validated job task analysis, the person shall pass the medical
examination, appropriate to the agency's job task analysis, of the employing agency.
All agencies shall certify passing medical examination results to the council, which
shall accept them as complying with KRS 15.310 to 15.510;
(11) Have passed a drug screening test administered or approved by the council by
administrative regulation. A person shall be deemed to have passed a drug
screening test if the results of the test are negative for the use of an illegal
controlled substance or prescription drug abuse. Any agency that administers its
own test that meets or exceeds this standard shall certify passing test results to the
council, which shall accept them as complying with KRS 15.310 to 15.510;
(12) Have undergone a background investigation established or approved by the council
by administrative regulation to determine suitability for the position of a peace
officer. If the employing agency has established its own background investigation
that meets or exceeds the standards of the council, as set forth by administrative
regulation, the agency shall conduct the background investigation and shall certify
background investigation results to the council, which shall accept them as
complying with KRS 15.310 to 15.510;
(13) Have been interviewed by the employing agency;
(14) Not have had certification as a peace officer permanently revoked in another state;
(15) Have taken a psychological suitability screening administered or approved by the
council by administrative regulation to determine the person's suitability to perform
peace officer duties as determined by a council validated job task analysis.
However, if the employing agency has its own validated job task analysis, the
person shall take that agency's psychological suitability screening[examination],
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 12/23/2024 12:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 257
appropriate to the agency's job task analysis. All agencies shall certify
psychological suitability screening[examination] results to the council, which shall
accept them as complying with KRS 15.310 to 15.510;
(16) (a) Have passed a physical agility test administered or approved by the council by
administrative regulation to determine his or her suitability to perform peace
officer duties as determined by a council validated job task analysis.
However, if the employing agency has its own validated job task analysis, the
person shall take the physical agility test[examination] of the employing
agency. All agencies shall certify physical agility test[examination] results to
the council, which shall accept them as demonstrating compliance with KRS
15.310 to 15.510;[ and]
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a person who has
previously been employed as a peace officer in the Commonwealth before
December 1, 1998, shall not be required to pass a physical agility test
administered or approved by the council by administrative regulation unless
the employing agency requires it as a condition of employment; and
(17) Have taken a polygraph examination administered or approved by the council by
administrative regulation to determine his or her suitability to perform peace officer
duties. Any agency that administers its own polygraph examination as approved by
the council shall certify the results that indicate whether a person is suitable for
employment as a peace officer to the council, which shall accept them as complying
with KRS 15.310 to 15.510.
Section 2. Whereas it is critical to ensure that police departments are able to
attract and hire highly qualified peace officers, an emergency is declared to exist, and this
Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise
becoming a law.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 12/23/2024 12:29 PM Jacketed